Washington statutes.
RCW 38.36.120

Fees and mileage.

Fees and mileage allowed for the service of process and for civilian witnesses shall be the same as in civil actions. All expenditures necessary to carry the provisions of chapter 130, Laws of 1943, into effect are hereby authorized to be incurred, and paid out of the appropriations for the maintenance of the organized militia of Washington.

[ 1943 c 130 s 78; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-78. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 59; 1909 c 134 s 90.]

NOTES:

Juror expense payments: RCW 2.36.150.

Travel expense in lieu of mileage in certain cases: RCW 2.40.030.

Witness fees and mileage: RCW 2.40.010.